Missouri, session 2026, HB2568.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.014, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 144.014, to read as follows:
144.014. 1. Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, beginning
October 1, 1997, except as provided under subsection 2 of this section, the tax levied and
imposed under this chapter on all retail sales of food shall be at the rate of one percent. The
revenue derived from the one percent rate pursuant to this section shall be deposited by the
state treasurer in the school district trust fund and shall be distributed as provided in section
144.701.
2. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning January
1, 2027, no state sales or use tax shall be levied or imposed on any retail sale of food in
this state. The exemption granted under this subsection shall not apply to local sales tax
as defined under section 32.085, or local use tax levied or imposed as authorized by law.
If the exemption provided under this subdivision is sunset as provided under
subdivision (2) of this subsection, the provisions of the one percent tax imposed on all
retail sales of food under subsection 1 of this section shall apply beginning on and after
the date of the expiration of the exemption.
(2) Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2568 2
(a) The provisions of the exemption authorized under this subsection shall sunset
three years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(b) If such exemption is reauthorized, the exemption authorized under this
subsection shall sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of this
section.
3. For the purposes of this section, the term "food" shall include only those products
and types of food for which [food stamps] benefits may be redeemed pursuant to the
provisions of the [Federal Food Stamp Program] Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Programas [contained] describedin 7 U.S.C. Section 2012, as that section now reads or as it
may be amended hereafter, and shall include food dispensed by or through vending machines.
For the purpose of this section, except for vending machine sales, the term "food" shall not
include food or drink sold by any establishment where the gross receipts derived from the sale
of food prepared by such establishment for immediate consumption on or off the premises of
the establishment constitutes more than eighty percent of the total gross receipts of that
establishment, regardless of whether such prepared food is consumed on the premises of that
establishment, including, but not limited to, sales of food by any restaurant, fast food
restaurant, delicatessen, eating house, or café.
✔